Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-1352] Procurement
institute; established. There is established the procurement institute at
the William S. Richardson School of Law, University of Hawaii, to be under the
direction of a director who shall be appointed by the dean of the school of
law, with the approval of the board of regents. Subject to the availability of
funds, faculty, and facilities, the institute shall offer such courses of study
as may be deemed appropriate and authorized by the board of regents. The
institute shall cooperate with other public and private entities and persons to
promote and develop a professional acquisition workforce and to improve and
enhance the State's contractor industrial base through education and training.
The procurement institute may:

(1) Conduct and participate in procurement education
and training for entry-level and higher-qualified state employees and others,
including persons not employed by the State;

(2) Conduct and promote research, conferences, and
studies to improve the procurement process, laws, policies, methods, rules,
procedures, and forms relating to state and local government procurement;

(3) Report on and make recommendations regarding
goals, guidelines, innovations, and evaluation of state and local government
procurement initiatives; and

(4) Establish and maintain a procurement library
within the State. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next